Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
KAKAAKO COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT

[§206E-31] Kakaako community development
district; purposes. The legislature finds that:

(1) The Kakaako district is centrally located in
Honolulu proper, in close proximity to the central business district, the
government center, commercial, industrial and market facilities, major existing
and contemplated transportation routes and recreational and service areas;

(2) Due to its present function as a service and
light industrial area, the district is relatively underdeveloped and has
especially in view of its proximity to the urban core where the pressure for
all land uses is strong the potential for increased growth and development that
can alleviate community needs such as low-income housing, parks and open space,
and commercial and industrial facilities;

(3) The district, if not redeveloped or renewed, has
the potential to become a blighted and deteriorated area. Due to its present
economic importance to the State in terms of industry and subsequent
employment, there is a need to preserve and enhance its value and potential;

(4) Kakaako has a potential, if properly developed
and improved, to become a planned new community in consonance with surrounding
urban areas.

In coordinating community development in the
Kakaako district, the authority shall plan a mixed-use district whereby
industrial, commercial, residential, and public uses may coexist compatibly
within the same area.

The authority shall plan for the above uses,
but shall also respect and support the present function of Kakaako as a major
economic center, providing significant employment in such areas as light
industrial, wholesaling, service, and commercial activity. [L 1976, c 153, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next